Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4263 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
HB3567 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. As used in this act:
1. "Candidate" means any individual who has filed a declaration
of candidacy or has accepted or expended campaign funds to seek
nomination, election, or retention to any public office in this
state;
2. "Family member" means the candidate's spouse, domestic
partner, parent, child, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, aunt,
uncle, niece, nephew, or any individual residing in the candidate's
household;
3. "Major retailer" means a business primarily engaged in
general retail sales to the public with fixed, publicly accessible
locations and standard pricing, including, but not limited to,
grocery stores, office supply stores, and hardware stores; and
4. "Vendor" means any individual, business entity, political
consulting firm, or organization that receives campaign funds in
exchange for goods or services.
B. A candidate shall not expend campaign funds to compensate
the candidate for services rendered to the candidate's own campaign,
including, but not limited to, consulting, management, strategy,
media, compliance, or administrative services.
C. Any compensation to a family member, another elected
official, or a registered candidate for public office for work on
the candidate's campaign shall be paid directly from the candidate's
campaign account.
HB3567 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. No vendor, consultant, political committee, or other
recipient of campaign funds shall directly or indirectly pay,
transfer, or provide anything of value to the candidate or any
family member of the candidate for services rendered to:
1. The candidate's own campaign; or
2. Any other campaign for public office.
E. 1. Any vendor to whom a candidate pays more than Two
Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) in aggregate during an election cycle,
excluding payments to major retailers, shall execute an anti-
kickback certification prescribed by the Oklahoma Ethics Commission.
2. The certification shall affirm, under penalty of perjury,
that the vendor has not provided and will not provide any prohibited
payment or thing of value to the candidate or a family member of the
candidate in violation of this act.
3. The candidate shall maintain a copy of each certification
and submit such certifications with the candidate's campaign finance
reports as required by Ethics Commission rule.
F. 1. The Oklahoma Ethics Commission shall promulgate rules
necessary to implement and enforce this act.
2. A violation of this act may be punished by:
a. civil penalties,
b. restitution of unlawful expenditures,
c. referral for criminal prosecution as provided by law,
and
HB3567 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

d. any other sanction authorized by law.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES, dated 03/04/2026 - DO PASS,
As Amended and Coauthored.
















HB3567 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.